Wyoming, session 2026, HB0017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-11-701(a)(intro), (b)(i), (ii),
(c)(intro) and (i) and 40-31-105(e) are amended to read:

ARTICLE 7
SELECT COMMITTEE ON BLOCKCHAIN AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES

HB0017

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0009
28-11-701. Appointment of members; powers and duties;
executive branch liaisons.

(a) Not later than March 15 following each general
election, a select committee on blockchain, financial
technology and digital innovation technology and emerging
technologies shall be appointed subject to the following:

(b) The select committee shall:

(i) Develop knowledge and expertise among its
members regarding issues pertaining to blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies;

(ii) Develop and introduce legislation as
necessary to promote blockchain, financial technology and
digital innovation in Wyoming unless the legislation
relates to Title 13 of the Wyoming statues, in which case
the legislation shall be recommended to the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee for
consideration Wyoming's continued leadership in the digital
economy by:
HB0017

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0009

(A) Reducing impediments to economic
opportunities for technology and technology companies
within the state;

(B) Developing policies that encourage
technology companies to locate and remain in the state;

(C) Promoting further development of
digital commercial activity in the state.

(c) Not later than March 15 following each general
election, the governor shall appoint three (3) persons to
serve as liaisons to the select committee on blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies. The governor may, in a manner
consistent with W.S. 9-1-202, remove any liaison to the
select committee. The liaisons shall:

(i) Aid, assist and advise the select committee
on issues pertaining to blockchain, financial technology
and digital innovation technology and emerging
technologies;
HB0017

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0009

40-31-105. Powers of the commission.

(e) Before publicly issuing any fully reserved
Wyoming stable tokens, the director shall provide a
comprehensive report to the select committee on blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies and the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee on all actions taken
under this act.

Section 2. For all purposes the select committee on
blockchain and emerging technologies, as renamed in this
act, is a continuation of the select committee on
blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation
technology.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0017